Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
TRANSFEREES AND CREDITORS OF PARTNER

7-64-501. Partner not co-owner of partnership property.

A partner is not a co-owner of partnership property and has no interest in partnership property which can be transferred, either voluntarily or involuntarily.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 883, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-502. Partner's transferable interest in partnership.

A partner's transferable interest is personal property. Only a partner's transferable interest may be transferred.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 883, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-503. Transfer of partner's transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a partner's transferable interest in the partnership:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause the partner's dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business; and

Does not entitle the transferee to participate in the management or conduct of the partnership business, to require access to information concerning partnership transactions, or to inspect or copy the partnership books or records.

A transferee of a partner's transferable interest in the partnership has a right:

To receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled;

To receive upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, in accordance with the transfer, the net amount otherwise distributable to the transferor; and

To seek under section 7-64-801 (1)(f) a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business.

In a dissolution and winding up, a transferee is entitled to an account of partnership transactions only from the date of the latest account agreed to by all of the partners.

Upon transfer, the transferor retains the rights and duties of a partner other than the interest transferred.

A partnership need not give effect to a transferee's rights under this section until it has notice of the transfer. On request of the partnership or any partner, the transferee shall furnish reasonable proof of the transfer.

A transfer of a partner's transferable interest in the partnership in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 883, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-504. Partner's transferable interest subject to charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or of a partner's transferee, a court having jurisdiction may charge the transferable interest of the judgment debtor to satisfy the judgment. The court may appoint a receiver of the share of the distributions due or to become due to the judgment debtor in respect of the partnership and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries the judgment debtor might have made or which the circumstances of the case may require.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor's transferable interest in the partnership. The court may order a foreclosure of the transferable interest subject to the charging order at any time. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale has the rights of a transferee.

At any time before foreclosure, a transferable interest charged may be redeemed:

By the judgment debtor;

With property other than partnership property, by one or more of the other partners; or

By the partnership with the consent of all of the partners whose transferable interests are not so charged or with such lesser consent as may be permitted by the partnership agreement.

This article does not deprive a partner of a right under exemption laws with respect to the partner's transferable interest in the partnership.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a partner or partner's transferee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor's transferable interest in the partnership.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 884, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.